Texas, session 892, HB110.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subchapter A, Chapter 253, Election Code, is amended by adding Section 253.008 to read as follows: Sec. 253.008.  PROHIBITION ON RECEIPT OF BOND PROCEEDS BY PERSONS WHO CONTRIBUTE TO CERTAIN POLITICAL COMMITTEES. Notwithstanding any law, a person who makes a contribution to a political committee that supports the issuance of a bond may not receive money, including payment under a contract for goods or services, from any proceeds in connection with the bond. SECTION 2.  Section 253.008, Election Code, as added by this Act, applies only to a contribution to a political committee that is made on or after the effective date of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect immediately if it receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution. If this Act does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.